Utah statutes.
4-23-3.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Agricultural crops" means any product of cultivation;

(2)  "Board" means the Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board;

(3)  "Bounty" means the monetary compensation paid persons for the harvest of predatory or depredating animals;

(4)  "Damage" means any injury or loss to livestock, poultry, agricultural crops, or wildlife inflicted by predatory or depredating animals or depredating birds;

(5)  "Depredating animal" means a field mouse, gopher, ground squirrel, jack rabbit, raccoon, or prairie dog;

(6)  "Depredating bird" means a Brewer's blackbird or starling;

(7)  "Livestock" means cattle, horses, mules, sheep, goats, and swine;

(8)  "Predatory animal" means any coyote; and

(9)  "Wildlife" means any form of animal life generally living in a state of nature, except a predatory animal or a depredating animal or bird.



Amended by Chapter 109, 1989 General Session

